Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1010
Utilities; supplemental powers.

The powers granted under sections 66-1001 to 66-1011 to public power districts, municipal electric utilities, rural power districts, and electric cooperative corporations shall be supplemental to those powers granted in Chapter 18 or 70.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 23.